District of Columbia statutes.
50-1204

Entry of lien — Form and requirements of instrument creating lien; when lien not entered.

(a)

An instrument:

(1)

Shall be in writing;

(2)

Shall show the name and address of the holder, the trade name and engine, serial or identification number of the motor vehicle or the trade name and serial number, if any, of the trailer; and

(3)

Shall be signed by the parties.

(b)

A lien shall not be entered upon a certificate unless:

(1)

The motor vehicle or trailer has been previously titled or registered in this or some other jurisdiction and the lien is shown upon such previous certificate, title, registry, or proof of ownership;

(2)

Such an instrument is presented for recording pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; or

(3)

The lien is shown on the application for a certificate, and was created prior to January 1, 1941, or was created while the motor vehicle or trailer was titled or registered in some other jurisdiction.

History

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 737, ch. 527, § 4
June 4, 1952, 66 Stat. 100, ch. 365, § 1
Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 771, Pub. L. 88-243, § 7
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 45, 46 DCR 2118

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1218.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1004.
1973 Ed., § 40-704.